Washington statutes.
RCW 15.28.110

Duties of commission.

The commission's duties are:

(1) To adopt a commission seal;

(2) To elect a secretary-manager and a treasurer, and fix their compensation. The same person may be elected to both offices;

(3) To establish classifications of soft tree fruits;

(4) To conduct scientific research and develop the healthful, therapeutic, and dietetic value of fruits, and promote the general welfare of the soft tree fruit industry of the state;

(5) To conduct a comprehensive advertising and educational campaign to effectuate the objects of this chapter;

(6) To increase the production, and develop and expand the markets, and improve the handling and quality of fruits;

(7) To keep accurate accounts and records of all of its dealings, which shall be open to inspection and audit by the state auditor;

(8) To investigate and prosecute violations of this chapter; and

(9) To serve as an advisory committee to the director with regard to the adoption and enforcement of rules:

(a) Governing the grading, packing, and size and dimensions of commercial containers of soft tree fruits; and

(b) Fixing commercial grades of soft tree fruits and the issuance of certificates of inspection for those fruits.

[ 2002 c 313 s 106; 1961 c 11 s 15.28.110. Prior: (i) 1947 c 73 s 13, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2909-22, part. (ii) 1947 c 73 s 14; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2909-23. (iii) 1947 c 73 s 15, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2909-24, part. (iv) 1947 c 73 s 17, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2909-26, part.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.